New Jersey, session 221, A561.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  During the course of each school year, a pupil of a public school shall be entitled to up to five absences from school to care for the pupils mental or behavioral health needs, for which the pupil shall be given the opportunity to make up any school work missed during the absence. The pupil may be referred to the appropriate school support personnel following the pupils second mental or behavioral health absence. b.    The five absences from school to care for a pupils mental or behavioral health needs shall be recorded as excused absences on the pupils attendance record or on that of any group or class of which the pupil is a member.  Any transcript, application, employment form, or any similar form on which information concerning a pupils attendance record is requested shall not show, with respect to absences, any excused absences authorized pursuant to this subsection.  In making a determination on whether or not a pupil has a perfect attendance record for the school year, a school district shall not consider as an absence an excused absence authorized pursuant to this subsection. c.     A pupil shall provide such non-medical documentation as the superintendent or administrative principal of the school district deems necessary to prove the pupil meets the requirements for the excused absence related to mental or behavioral health under subsection a. of this section. 2.  The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, shall develop guidelines on defining an excused absence from school based on the mental or behavioral health of the pupil. 3.  This act shall take effect 180 days following the date of enactment, but shall remain inoperative until the first day of the first full school year following the effective date. The Commissioner of Education may take such anticipatory action as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.